Illinois, session 104th, HB4792.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 521B-70 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/21B-70)7    Sec. 21B-70. Illinois Teaching Excellence Program.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Diverse candidate" means a candidate who identifies with 10any of the ethnicities reported on the Illinois Report Card 11other than White. 12    "Hard-to-staff school" means a public school that either 13(i) is identified as hard-to-staff based on data reported on 14the school report card under Section 10-17a of this Code or 15(ii) does not have a school report card under Section 10-17a of 16this Code but serves a student population in which no less than 1730% or more of the student enrollment is considered low-income 18as determined by the State Board of Education using available 19enrollment or funding data reported by the report card under 20Section 10-17a of this Code. 21    "National Board certified teacher candidate cohort 22facilitator" means a National Board certified teacher who 23collaborates to advance the goal of supporting all other   HB4792 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 18989 LNS 32434 b1candidate cohorts other than diverse candidate cohorts through 2the Illinois National Board for Professional Teaching 3Standards Comprehensive Support System. 4    "National Board certified teacher diverse candidate cohort 5facilitator" means a National Board certified teacher who 6collaborates to advance the goal of supporting racially and 7ethnically diverse candidates through the Illinois National 8Board for Professional Teaching Standards Comprehensive 9Support System.10    "National Board certified teacher diverse liaison" means 11an individual or entity that supports the National Board 12certified teacher leading a diverse candidate cohort.13    "National Board certified teacher liaison" means an 14individual or entity that supports the National Board 15certified teacher leading candidate cohorts other than diverse 16candidate cohorts. 17    "National Board certified teacher rural or remote or 18distant candidate cohort facilitator" means a National Board 19certified teacher who collaborates to advance the goal of 20supporting rural or remote candidates through the Illinois 21National Board for Professional Teaching Standards 22Comprehensive Support System. 23    "National Board certified teacher rural or remote or 24distant liaison" means an individual or entity that supports 25the National Board certified teacher leading a rural or remote 26candidate cohort.   HB4792 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 18989 LNS 32434 b1    "Qualified educator" means a teacher or school counselor 2currently employed in a school district who is in the process 3of obtaining certification through the National Board for 4Professional Teaching Standards or who has completed 5certification and holds a current Professional Educator 6License with a National Board for Professional Teaching 7Standards designation or a retired teacher or school counselor 8who holds a Professional Educator License with a National 9Board for Professional Teaching Standards designation.10    "Rural or remote" or "rural or remote or distant" means 11local codes 32, 33, 41, 42, and 43 of the New Urban-Centric 12Locale Codes, as defined by the National Center for Education 13Statistics. 14    "Tier 1" has the meaning given to that term under Section 1518-8.15. 16    "Tier 2" has the meaning given to that term under Section 1718-8.15. 18    (b) Any funds appropriated for the Illinois Teaching 19Excellence Program must be used to provide monetary assistance 20and incentives for qualified educators who are employed by or 21retired from school districts and who have or are in the 22process of obtaining licensure through the National Board for 23Professional Teaching Standards. The goal of the program is to 24improve instruction and student performance.25    The State Board of Education shall allocate an amount as 26annually appropriated by the General Assembly for the Illinois   HB4792 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 18989 LNS 32434 b1Teaching Excellence Program for (i) application or re-take 2fees for each qualified educator seeking to complete 3certification through the National Board for Professional 4Teaching Standards, to be paid directly to the National Board 5for Professional Teaching Standards, and (ii) incentives under 6paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subsection (c) for each 7qualified educator, to be distributed to the respective school 8district, and incentives under paragraph (5) of subsection 9(c), to be distributed to the respective school district or 10directly to the qualified educator. The school district shall 11distribute this payment to each eligible teacher or school 12counselor as a single payment.13    The State Board of Education's annual budget must set out 14by separate line item the appropriation for the program. 15Unless otherwise provided by appropriation, qualified 16educators are eligible for monetary assistance and incentives 17outlined in subsections (c) and (d) of this Section.18    (c) When there are adequate funds available, monetary 19assistance and incentives shall include the following:20        (1) A maximum of $2,000 toward the application or 21    re-take fee for teachers or school counselors in a Tier 1 22    school district who apply on a first-come, first-serve 23    basis for National Board certification.24        (2) A maximum of $2,000 toward the application or 25    re-take fee for teachers or school counselors in a school 26    district other than a Tier 1 school district who apply on a   HB4792 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 18989 LNS 32434 b1    first-come, first-serve basis for National Board 2    certification.3        (3) A maximum of $1,000 toward the National Board for 4    Professional Teaching Standards' renewal application fee.5        (4) (Blank).6        (5) An annual incentive of no more than $2,250 7    prorated at $50 per hour, which shall be paid to each 8    qualified educator currently employed in a school district 9    who holds both a National Board for Professional Teaching 10    Standards designation and a current corresponding 11    certificate issued by the National Board for Professional 12    Teaching Standards and who agrees, in writing, to provide 13    up to 45 hours of mentoring or National Board for 14    Professional Teaching Standards professional development 15    or both during the school year to classroom teachers or 16    school counselors, as applicable. Funds must be disbursed 17    on a first-come, first-serve basis, with priority given to 18    Tier 1 school districts. Mentoring shall include, either 19    singly or in combination, the following:20            (A) National Board for Professional Teaching 21        Standards certification candidates.22            (B) National Board for Professional Teaching 23        Standards re-take candidates.24            (C) National Board for Professional Teaching 25        Standards renewal candidates.26            (D) (Blank).  HB4792 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 18989 LNS 32434 b1    Funds may also be used for professional development 2training provided by the National Board Resource Center. 3    Funds may also be used for instructional leadership 4training for qualified educators interested in supporting 5implementation of the Illinois Learning Standards or teaching 6and learning priorities of the State Board of Education or 7both. 8    (d) In addition to the monetary assistance and incentives 9provided under subsection (c), if adequate funds are 10available, incentives shall include the following incentives 11for the program in rural or remote schools or school districts 12or for programs working with diverse candidates or for 13retention bonuses for hard-to-staff schools, to be distributed 14to the respective school district or directly to the qualified 15educator or entity: 16        (1) A one-time incentive of $3,000 payable to National 17    Board certified teachers teaching in Tier 1 or Tier 2 18    rural or remote school districts or rural or remote 19    schools in Tier 1 or Tier 2 school districts, with 20    priority given to teachers teaching in Tier 1 rural or 21    remote school districts or rural or remote schools in Tier 22    1 school districts. 23        (2) An annual incentive of $3,200 for National Board 24    certified teacher rural or remote or distant candidate 25    cohort facilitators, diverse candidate cohort 26    facilitators, and candidate cohort facilitators. Priority   HB4792 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 18989 LNS 32434 b1    shall be given to rural or remote candidate cohort 2    facilitators and diverse candidate cohort facilitators. 3        (3) An annual incentive of $2,500 for National Board 4    certified teacher rural or remote or distant liaisons, 5    diverse liaisons, and liaisons. Priority shall be given to 6    rural or remote liaisons and diverse liaisons. 7        (4) An annual retention bonus of $4,000 per year for 2 8    consecutive years shall be awarded to National Board 9    certified teachers employed in hard-to-staff schools. 10    Funds must be disbursed on a first-come, first-served 11    basis.12    (e) The State Board of Education may not deny a National 13Board certified teacher a retention bonus under this Section 14solely because the public school at which the teacher is 15employed does not have a school report card under Section 1610-17a of this Code. 17(Source: P.A. 103-122, eff. 6-30-23; 103-207, eff. 1-1-24; 18103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)